test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-keeles_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeeʹles contract stem valehtelija: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩeeʹles
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩeâllaz
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩeâllaz
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩeâllsest
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩeâllsin
     ǩeeʹles+N+Ess+Indef: ǩeâllsen
     ǩeeʹles+N+Par+Indef: ǩeâllsed
     ǩeeʹles+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâllaztaa, ǩeâllaztää]
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩeâllaz
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩeâllsid
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩeâllsid
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩeâllsin
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩeâllsivuiʹm
     ǩeeʹles+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâllsitaa, ǩeâllsitää]
     
